Utah statutes.
4-38-12.   Bribery and touting prohibited.
Any person who gives or promises or attempts to give, or any person who
receives or agrees to receive or attempts to receive, any money, bribe, or
thing of value with intent to influence any person to dishonestly umpire,
manage, direct, judge, preside, officiate at, or participate in any race
conducted under this chapter with the intent or purpose that the result of the
race will be affected or influenced thereby, is guilty of a felony of the
third degree and subject to a fine of not more than $10,000.
